Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB619.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 164.321 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Eastern Kentucky University, Morehead State University, Murray State University, Western Kentucky
University, Kentucky State University, and Northern Kentucky University[, and the Kentucky
Community and Technical College System] shall each be governed by a board of regents appointed for
a term set by law pursuant to Section 23 of the Constitution of Kentucky.
(b)[(a)] Each board of the comprehensive universities listed in subsection (1)(a) of this section shall
consist of eight (8) members appointed by the Governor, one (1) member of the teaching faculty, one
(1) member of the university nonteaching personnel, and one (1) member of the student body of the
respective university[ or college]. The members appointed by the Governor shall be subject to
confirmation by the Senate. The members of the board shall select a chairperson annually[.
(b) The board of the Kentucky Community and Technical College System shall consist of eight (8)
members appointed by the Governor, two (2) members of the teaching faculty, two (2) members of the
nonteaching personnel, and two (2) members of the student body. The members appointed by the
Governor shall be subject to confirmation by the Senate.
1. No more than three (3) appointed members of the board shall reside in any one (1) judicial district of
the Kentucky Supreme Court as of the date of the appointment.
2. A change in residency of a gubernatorial appointee after the date of appointment shall not affect the
appointee's ability to serve or eligibility for reappointment, except an appointee who assumes residency
outside the fifty (50) United States shall become immediately ineligible to serve. The Council on
Postsecondary Education shall notify the appointee of his or her ineligibility to serve.
3. In making initial appointments, the Governor shall act so as to provide equal representation of the two
(2) sexes. In filling vacancies, the Governor shall act so as to provide, inasmuch as possible, equal
representation of the two (2) sexes by appointing a member of the sex that is the lesser represented at
the time of the appointment. If the remaining membership already has an equal number of males and
females, the Governor may appoint a member of either sex].
(c)[(2)] The terms of appointed members shall be for six (6) years and until their successors are
appointed and qualified, unless a member is removed by the Governor pursuant to KRS 63.080(2), (3),
or (4)[, except the initial appointments to the board of regents for the Kentucky Community and
Technical College System shall be as follows:
(a) One (1) member shall serve a one (1) year term;
(b) One (1) member shall serve a two (2) year term;
(c) Two (2) members shall serve three (3) year terms;
(d) One (1) member shall serve a four (4) year term;
(e) One (1) member shall serve a five (5) year term; and
(f) Two (2) members shall serve six (6) year terms].
(d) New appointees of a board[ of regents] shall not serve for more than two (2) consecutive terms.
(e) 1.[(3)] The gubernatorial appointments may include one (1) graduate of the respective institution who
resides outside the Commonwealth.
2. No[Not] more than two (2) appointed members of any board shall be residents of one (1) county.
3. The appointments shall reflect the proportional representation of the two (2) leading political
parties of the Commonwealth based on the state's voter registration and the political affiliation of
each appointee as of December 31 of the year preceding the date of his or her appointment. A
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
particular political affiliation shall not be a prerequisite to appointment to any board generally;
however, if any person is appointed to a board that does not represent either of the two (2)
leading political parties of the Commonwealth, the proportional representation by political
affiliation requirement shall be determined and satisfied based on the total number of members
on the board less any members not affiliated with either of the two (2) leading political parties[.
Membership on the board shall reflect no less than proportional representation of the minority
racial composition of the Commonwealth based on the total minority racial population using the
most recent census or estimate data from the United States Census Bureau. If the determination
of proportional minority representation does not result in a whole number of minority members,
it shall be rounded up to the next whole number].
4. Membership on the board shall not be incompatible with any state office.
5. A change in residency after the date of appointment shall not affect a member's ability to serve
nor shall it prevent a member's eligibility for reappointment, except a member who assumes
residency outside the fifty (50) United States shall become immediately ineligible to serve.
6. The Council on Postsecondary Education shall notify the appointee of his or her ineligibility to
serve.
(f)[(4)] Appointments to fill vacancies shall be made in the same manner and within the same time after
the occurrence of the vacancy as regular appointments. The person appointed shall hold the position for
the unexpired term only.
(g)[(5)] Each member of the board shall serve for the term for which the member is appointed and until a
successor is appointed and qualified, unless a member is removed by the Governor pursuant to KRS
63.080(2), (3), or (4).
(h)[(6) (a)] The faculty member of a board[comprehensive university] shall be a teaching or research
member of the faculty of his or her respective university of the rank of assistant professor or above. The
faculty member shall be elected by secret ballot by all faculty members of his or her university of the
rank of instructor, assistant professor, or above. The faculty member shall serve for a term of three (3)
years and until his successor is elected and qualified. The faculty member shall be eligible for
reelection, but he or she shall not be eligible to continue to serve as a member of the board if he or she
ceases being a member of the teaching staff of the university. Elections to fill vacancies shall be for the
unexpired term in the same manner as provided for the original election[.
(b) The faculty members of the Kentucky Community and Technical College System shall be represented
by one (1) faculty member elected from the community colleges and one (1) faculty member elected
from the technical institutions to serve three (3) year terms and until their successors are named. The
faculty representative of each branch shall be elected by means of a process established by the board.
The faculty members may be reelected but shall not serve more than two (2) consecutive terms. A
faculty member shall be ineligible to continue to serve as a member of the board if he or she ceases to
be a member of the faculty at one (1) of the institutions within the system. Elections to fill vacancies
shall be for the unexpired term in the same manner as provided for the original election. These two (2)
members shall collectively have one (1) vote which may be cast one-half (1/2) vote by each member].
(i)[(7) (a)] The nonteaching personnel member of a board[ in a comprehensive university] shall be any full-
time staff member, excluding the president, vice presidents, academic deans, and academic department
chairpersons. He or she shall represent all nonteaching university employees including[,] but not limited
to[,] building facilities and clerical personnel. The member shall be elected by secret ballot by the
nonteaching employees. The nonteaching personnel member shall serve a term of three (3) years and
until a successor is elected and qualified. The nonteaching personnel member shall be eligible for
reelection, but he or she shall not be eligible to continue to serve as a member of the board if he or she
ceases being an employee of the university. Elections to fill vacancies shall be for the unexpired term in
the same manner as provided for the original election[.
(b) The nonteaching personnel members in the Kentucky Community and Technical College System shall
be any full-time staff member excluding a president, chancellor, vice president, academic dean,
academic department chair, or other administrator. They shall represent all nonteaching employees in
their respective branch institutions including, but not limited to, support and clerical personnel. One (1)
member shall be a representative from the community colleges and one (1) member shall be a
representative from the technical institutions. They shall serve three (3) year terms and until their

CHAPTER 164 3
successors are named. These two (2) members shall collectively have one (1) vote which may be cast
one-half (1/2) vote by each member. The nonteaching personnel members of each branch shall be
elected by means of a process established by the board. A nonteaching personnel member may be
reelected but shall not serve more than two (2) consecutive terms. A nonteaching employee shall be
ineligible to continue to serve as a member of the board if that employee ceases to be a nonteaching
employee at one (1) of the institutions within the system. Elections to fill vacancies shall be for the
unexpired term in the same manner as provided for the original election].
(j)[(8) (a)] The student body member of a[ on a comprehensive university] board shall serve a one (1) year
term beginning on July 1 after being elected and sworn in as student body president and ending on the
following June 30. If the student member does not maintain the position as student body president or
the status as a full-time student at any time during that academic year, a special election shall be held to
select a full-time student member. The elected student member shall serve for the remainder of the
unexpired term[.
(b) Two (2) full-time student members shall be elected to the board of regents for the Kentucky
Community and Technical College System. One (1) shall represent students of the community colleges
and one (1) shall represent the technical institutions. The student members shall be elected by means of
a process established by the board. The student members shall serve one (1) year terms beginning on
July 1 after being elected and sworn in as a student member of the board and ending on the following
June 30. If the student member does not maintain the status as a full-time student, a special election
shall be held to fill the vacancy for the remainder of the unexpired term. The two (2) members shall
collectively have one (1) vote which may be cast one-half (1/2) vote by each member].
(k)[(9)] All appointed and elected persons shall be required to attend and complete an orientation and
education program prescribed by the council under KRS 164.020(24)[,] as a condition of their service
and eligibility for appointment or election to a second term.
(l)[(10)] Board members may be removed by the Governor under the following circumstances:
1.[(a)] For cause, pursuant to KRS 63.080(2); or
2.[(b)] Pursuant to KRS 63.080(3) or (4).
(m)[(11)] The inability of a[the] board[ or boards of the comprehensive universities or Kentucky
Community and Technical College System] to hold quarterly meetings, to elect a chairperson annually,
to establish a quorum, to adopt an annual budget, to set tuition rates, to conduct an annual evaluation of
the president of the university[ or system], to carry out its primary function to periodically evaluate the
university's[ or system's] progress in implementing its mission, goals, and objectives to conform to the
strategic agenda, or to otherwise perform its duties under KRS 164.350 shall be cause for the Governor
to remove all appointed members of the board[ or boards] and replace the entire appointed membership
pursuant to KRS 63.080(4).
(2) (a) The Kentucky Community and Technical College System shall be governed by a board of regents
appointed for a term set by law pursuant to Section 93 of the Constitution of Kentucky.
(b) 1. Beginning on October 1, 2026, the board of the Kentucky Community and Technical College
System shall consist of the following seventeen (17) members:
a. Fourteen (14) members appointed by the Governor, as follows:
i. One (1) member selected from a list of three (3) names submitted by the
Kentucky Association of School Administrators;
ii. One (1) member selected from a list of three (3) names submitted by the
Kentucky Association of Manufacturers;
iii. One (1) member selected from a list of three (3) names submitted by the
Associated General Contractors of Kentucky;
iv. One (1) member selected from a list of three (3) names submitted by the
Kentucky Hospital Association;
v. One (1) member selected from a list of three (3) names submitted by the
Kentucky Association for Economic Development;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
vi. One (1) member selected from a list of three (3) names submitted by the Energy
Planning and Inventory Commission established in KRS 164.2807; and
vii. Eight (8) members appointed from the state at large; and
b. Three (3) members elected in accordance with subsection (2)(h) of this section, as
follows:
i. One (1) member of the KCTCS teaching faculty;
ii. One (1) member of the KCTCS nonteaching personnel; and
iii. One (1) member of the KCTCS student body.
2. The members appointed by the Governor shall be subject to confirmation by the Senate.
3. The members of the board shall select a chairperson annually.
(c) The terms of appointed board members shall be for four (4) years and until their successors are
appointed and qualified, unless a member is removed by the Governor pursuant to KRS 63.080(2),
(3), or (4).
(d) New appointees of the board shall not serve for more than two (2) consecutive terms.
(e) 1. No more than one (1) appointed member of the board shall be a resident of one (1) county.
2. At least one (1) but no more than three (3) appointed members of the board shall reside in any
one (1) judicial district of the Kentucky Supreme Court as of the date of the appointment.
3. The appointments to the board shall reflect the proportional representation of the two (2)
leading political parties of the Commonwealth based on the state's voter registration and the
political affiliation of each appointee as of December 31 of the year preceding the date of his
or her appointment. A particular political affiliation shall not be a prerequisite to appointment
to the board generally; however, if any person is appointed to the board that does not represent
either of the two (2) leading political parties of the Commonwealth, the proportional
representation by political affiliation requirement shall be determined and satisfied based on
the total number of members on the board less any members not affiliated with either of the
two (2) leading political parties.
4. Membership on the board shall not be incompatible with any state office.
5. a. A change in residency after the date of appointment shall not affect a member's ability
to serve, except that a member who assumes residency:
i. Outside the fifty (50) United States shall become immediately ineligible to serve;
and
ii. That places the board in violation of the requirements of subparagraphs 1. and 2.
of this paragraph shall become immediately ineligible to serve.
b. The Council on Postsecondary Education shall notify the appointee of his or her
ineligibility to serve.
6. No appointed member of the board shall have a conflict of interest in accordance with KRS
45A.340 or be a relative of any employee of the system.
(f) Appointments to fill vacancies shall be made in the same manner and within the same time after the
occurrence of the vacancy as regular appointments. The person appointed shall hold the position for
the unexpired term only.
(g) Each member of the board shall serve for the term for which the member is appointed and until a
successor is appointed and qualified, unless a member is removed by the Governor pursuant to KRS
63.080(2), (3), or (4).
(h) Members elected to the board shall be as follows:
1. The teaching faculty member of the board shall be a teaching member of the faculty of the
KCTCS. The faculty member shall be elected by secret ballot by all regular full-time faculty
members of the KCTCS. The faculty member shall serve for a term of three (3) years and until
a successor is elected and qualified. The faculty member shall be eligible for reelection, but he

CHAPTER 164 5
or she shall not be eligible to continue to serve as a member of the board if he or she ceases
being a member of the teaching faculty of the KCTCS. Elections to fill vacancies shall be for
the unexpired term in the same manner as provided for the original election;
2. The nonteaching personnel member of the board shall be any full-time staff member,
excluding the president, chancellor, provost, vice presidents, academic deans, academic
department chairpersons, and any other administrator who supervises two (2) or more
employees and reports directly to the president or chancellor. He or she shall represent all
nonteaching employees of the KCTCS, including but not limited to building facilities and
clerical personnel. The member shall be elected by secret ballot by the nonteaching employees.
The nonteaching personnel member shall serve a term of three (3) years and until a successor
is elected and qualified. The nonteaching personnel member shall be eligible for reelection,
but he or she shall not be eligible to continue to serve as a member of the board if he or she
ceases being an employee of the KCTCS. Elections to fill vacancies shall be for the unexpired
term in the same manner as provided for the original election; and
3. The student body member of the board shall be elected by means of a process established by
the board. The student member shall serve a one (1) year term beginning on July 1 after being
elected and sworn in as the student body member of the board and ending on the following
June 30. If the student member does not maintain status as a full-time student, a special
election shall be held to fill the vacancy for the remainder of the unexpired term.
(i) All appointed and elected board members shall be required to attend and complete an orientation and
education program prescribed by the council under KRS 164.020(24) as a condition of their service
and eligibility for appointment or election to a second term.
(j) Board members may be removed by the Governor under the following circumstances:
1. For cause, pursuant to KRS 63.080(2);
2. Pursuant to KRS 63.080(3) or (4); or
3. Upon the request of the president or chairman of the board after the member has failed to
attend three (3) consecutive regularly scheduled meetings, which shall be considered gross
neglect of duty pursuant to KRS 63.080(2)(d).
(k) The inability of the board to hold quarterly meetings, to elect a chairperson annually, to establish a
quorum, to adopt an annual budget, to set tuition rates, to conduct an annual evaluation of the
president of the system, to carry out its primary function, to periodically evaluate the system's
progress in implementing its mission, goals, and objectives to conform to the strategic agenda, or to
otherwise perform its duties under Section 2 of this Act shall be cause for the Governor to remove all
appointed members of the board and replace the entire appointed membership pursuant to KRS
63.080(4).
Section 2. KRS 164.350 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The government of each of the state universities and the Kentucky Community and Technical College System
is vested in its respective board of regents. Each board[ of regents], when its members have been appointed
and qualified, shall constitute a body corporate, with the usual corporate powers, and with all immunities,
rights, privileges, and franchises usually attaching to the governing bodies of educational institutions. Each
board may:
(a) Receive grants of money and expend the same for the use and benefit of the university or college;
(b) Require such reports from the president, officers, faculty, and employees as it deems necessary and
proper from time to time;
(c) Determine the number of divisions, departments, bureaus, offices, and agencies needed for the
successful conduct of the affairs of the university or college; and
(d) Grant diplomas and confer degrees upon the recommendation of the president and faculty.
(2) Each board shall adopt bylaws, rules, and regulations for the governance of its members, officers, agents, and
employees, which shall reference the member removal and replacement provisions of KRS 63.080, and the
board shall enforce obedience to such bylaws, rules, and regulations.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(3) Each board[ of regents] shall periodically evaluate the institution's progress in implementing its missions,
goals, and objectives to conform to the adopted strategic agenda. Officers and officials shall be held
accountable for the status of the institution's progress.
(4) (a) In addition to the duties required in subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section, the board[ of regents]
for the Kentucky Community and Technical College System, upon recommendation of the president of
the system, shall:
1. [(a) Develop and implement guidelines for the preparation of biennial budget requests by the
administrators of the colleges within the system. The guidelines shall define the processes for
review and approval by the boards of directors for the colleges;
(b) Adopt a]Review the president's biennial budget request for the Kentucky Community and
Technical College System[ upon the recommendation of the president of the system;
(c) Adopt an allocation process for distributing funds to the colleges within the system;
(d) Consider recommendations from the boards of directors of the colleges to improve the overall
budget planning and allocation processes];
2.[(e)] Designate each college with a name;
3.[(f)] Encourage and accept donations of land and funds to be used in the acquisition, construction, or
operations of colleges in the system. The board may commemorate donations from private
persons or corporations with suitable memorials;[ and]
4.[(g)] Accept federal grants when deemed appropriate to be used in the acquisition, construction, or
operations of colleges in the system;[.]
5. Review[The board of regents shall ensure that] the budget planning and implementation
processes to ensure consistency[are consistent] with the adopted strategic agenda and biennial
budget and with the missions of the colleges[institutions] within the system; and
(b) The board of regents shall adopt policy specifying the minimum qualifications of the president of the
system and the chancellors of the colleges, which shall be the same.
Section 3. KRS 164.365 is amended to read as follows:
[(1) ]Anything in any statute of the Commonwealth to the contrary notwithstanding, the power over and control of
appointments, qualifications, salaries, and compensation payable out of the State Treasury or otherwise, promotions,
and official relations of all employees of Eastern Kentucky University, Western Kentucky University, Murray State
University, Northern Kentucky University, and Morehead State University, as provided in KRS 164.350 and 164.360,
and of Kentucky State University and the Kentucky Community and Technical College System, shall be under the
exclusive jurisdiction of the respective governing boards of each of the institutions named[.
(2) The board of regents for the Kentucky Community and Technical College System shall develop personnel
rules for the governing of its members, officers, agents, and employees by June 30, 1998. The board shall
adopt interim policies to govern employees hired from July 1, 1997, until the permanent rules are adopted.
(3) Upon receipt of a written authorization from an employee of the Kentucky Community and Technical College
System, the board shall deduct dues from the employee's paycheck for employee membership organizations,
except that no deduction shall be made for labor organization membership dues, fees, assessments, or
contributions for political activities. Dues shall be deducted at a rate established by the organization, and shall
be discontinued upon written notification by an employee to both the system and the employee organization.
On a quarterly basis, the Kentucky Community and Technical College System shall provide to each employee
membership organization an updated list that includes the names and home addresses of the employees who
are having dues deducted from their paychecks for the purpose of maintaining membership in that
organization].
Section 4. KRS 164.580 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Community and Technical College System is established and[. The Kentucky Community and
Technical College System] shall provide:
(a) A general two (2) year academic curriculum with credits transferable to two (2) year and four (4) year
colleges and universities;
(b) Technical and semiprofessional programs of two (2) years or less;

CHAPTER 164 7
(c) Within a two (2) year college curriculum, courses in general education, including adult education, not
necessarily intended for transfer nor technically oriented; and
(d) Services to Kentucky's employers and the general public to provide continuing education and
customized training for purposes of improving the knowledge and skills of Kentucky workers and
citizens in all regions of the state.
(2) The KCTCS[Kentucky Community and Technical College System] shall be responsive to the needs of students
and employers in all regions of the Commonwealth with accessible education and training to support the
lifelong learning needs of Kentucky citizens in order to:
(a) Increase the basic academic and literacy skills of adults through adult basic education and remedial
education services;
(b) Increase the technical skills and professional expertise of Kentucky workers through associate and
technical degrees, diploma, and certificate programs;
(c) Increase the access for students to complete [the ]prebaccalaureate associate degrees[degree in arts or
associate degree in science for ease of transfer to four (4) year institutions];
(d) Enhance the relationship of credentials between secondary and postsecondary programs which permit
secondary students to enter programs through early admission, advanced placement, or dual enrollment;
(e) Facilitate transfers of credit between certificate, diploma, technical, and associate degree programs;
(f) Develop a pool of educated citizens to support the expansion of existing business and industry and the
recruitment of new business and industry;
(g) Enhance the flexibility and adaptability of Kentucky workers in an ever- changing and global economy
through continuing education and customized training for business and industry;
(h) Promote the cultural and economic well-being of the communities throughout Kentucky; and
(i) Improve the quality of life for Kentucky's citizens.
(3) Students attending a college under the administration of the board of regents for the KCTCS[Kentucky
Community and Technical College System] may pursue a[three (3) kinds of] degree, certificate, or diploma
through the following programs:
(a) [Associate degree programs approved by the board of trustees as of the effective date of the transfer of
the management responsibilities of the University of Kentucky Community College System to the
Kentucky Community and Technical College System;
(b) ]Associate degree programs developed by the KCTCS[Kentucky Community and Technical College
System], approved by the board of regents and the Council on Postsecondary Education. The board of
regents shall confer degrees and award diplomas for the approved programs;[ and]
(b)[(c)] Joint degree programs developed between the KCTCS[Kentucky Community and Technical
College System] and other institutions; and
(c) Certificate and diploma programs developed by the KCTCS and reviewed by the board of regents that
do not lead to an associate degree.
(4) [University of Kentucky Community College System students who were officially enrolled on or before June
30, 1999, in associate degree programs approved by the board of trustees of the University of Kentucky and
who complete the associate degree programs on or before June 30, 2004, shall have their degrees conferred by
the University of Kentucky board of trustees. The degrees for all other students enrolled shall be awarded by
the board of regents for the Kentucky Community and Technical College System.
(5) ]The board of regents for the KCTCS[ Kentucky Community and Technical College System] shall expedite,
whenever possible, action on requests for any new technical or associate degree program of a vocational-
technical or occupational nature.
(5)[(6)] The president of the KCTCS shall be responsible for oversight and management of the system,
including but not limited to:
(a) The supervision of all administrative and managerial aspects of the KCTCS's operations, including
personnel matters and fiscal management;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

8 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(b) Oversight of the operational and facilities plans of the KCTCS;
(c) Establishment of partnerships with community members, local governments, and other entities to
enhance the mission of the KCTCS; and
(d) Approval, modification, and discontinuance of academic and workforce programs after input and
recommendations from college faculty relating to curriculum and consultation with the board of
regents[Kentucky Community and Technical College System college faculty senates shall have the
primary responsibility for determining academic policy and curricula development that shall be
recommended to the president of the Kentucky Community and Technical College System.
(7) Technical colleges, through their faculty and accrediting procedures, may develop degree programs that shall
be considered for approval by the board of regents and the Council on Postsecondary Education. A graduate of
a program within three (3) years of the program becoming an accredited degree program shall receive all or
partial credit toward the degree, based on criteria established by the institution and approved by the board of
regents. The board of regents shall confer degrees and award diplomas for these programs].
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 164 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) By August 1, 2026, the president of the Kentucky Community and Technical College System shall employ a
chief financial officer who shall be responsible for the development, administration, and oversight of the
systemwide operating and capital budgets in accordance with the following:
(a) The chief financial officer shall provide the president with timely, accurate, and comprehensive
financial information, including but not limited to systemwide and college-level:
1. Budget summaries;
2. Revenue and expenditure reports;
3. Fund balances and reserves;
4. Cash flow projections;
5. Financial risks, variances, and material changes;
6 Any other financial information necessary for informed executive decision-making or
requested by the president; and
7. Any other information requested by the president;
(b) The chief financial officer shall provide financial information to the board of regents:
1. Quarterly or more often at the request of the president or the board of regents;
2. In a standardized format that allows comparison across colleges and over time; and
3. In writing and in person at a regularly scheduled meeting;
(c) The chief financial officer shall certify the accuracy of financial reports provided to the president or
the board of regents;
(d) The chief financial officer shall immediately disclose any material misstatements, omissions, or
financial concerns upon discovery to the president and the board of regents; and
(e) The chief financial officer shall oversee and ensure cooperation with all required audits and
financial reviews of the KCTCS.
(2) By August 1, 2026, the president of the KCTCS shall name a workforce liaison who shall provide guidance
to the president regarding ways the system shall remain responsive to local labor market demands, foster
strong employer relationships, and support the success of students and graduates in the workforce. The
workforce liaison shall:
(a) Work closely with the Cabinet for Economic Development and the Education and Labor Cabinet to
ensure the KCTCS is available and ready to provide workforce training in necessary areas based on
economic development needs;
(b) Facilitate employer engagement;
(c) Support recruitment and placement of students and graduates; and

CHAPTER 164 9
(d) Represent the system in discussions and planning relating to policy discussions with the Cabinet for
Economic Development and the Education and Labor Cabinet, community members, college staff,
and students.
Section 6. KRS 164.583 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Each [community ]college in[of] the Kentucky Community and Technical College System may offer, within
the two (2) year academic curriculum of the college, any and all lower division academic courses offered for
undergraduate credit at any and all of the four (4) year public colleges and universities.
(2) All lower division academic courses offered by the KCTCS[community colleges] shall be transferable for
academic credit to any and all four (4) year public colleges and universities, regardless of the number of
academic credits earned by any student at one (1) or more KCTCS colleges[community college].
(3) [Nothing in ]This section shall not be construed or interpreted to change, reduce, or otherwise affect the
required distribution between lower division and upper division courses now required for matriculation in an
undergraduate program at any institution of higher education.
(4) (a) If the KCTCS seeks to offer a new accredited program which will require dedicated general fund
appropriations for capital or operating expenses beyond the system's regular appropriations, the
president shall submit a proposal to the board of regents of KCTCS for review and approval. The
board's review shall include but not be limited to:
1. The proposed program's alignment with the mission and goals of the system;
2. The statewide or regional need the proposed program seeks to fill and how the system, through
the offering of this program, would meet this need;
3. Student demand for the proposed program;
4. Employer demand for the proposed program, including any potential industry partners;
5. Utilization of existing institutional resources to deliver the proposed program and how the
program would complement existing program offerings and not shift resources away from
those existing programs;
6. A five (5) year budgetary analysis of the proposed program, including program costs, funding
sources projected to support the program, and the amount of general fund appropriations
needed for capital or operating expenses;
7. The proposed program curriculum;
8. Any specialized accreditation or licensure requirements for the proposed program and
analysis of how those requirements would be met;
9. Admission and graduation requirements for the proposed program; and
10. Administrative oversight to ensure the quality of the proposed program.
(b) A proposal approved by the KCTCS board shall be submitted to the council for consideration in the
system's budget request for the next biennial budget in accordance with KRS 164.020(10) and
164.7915.
(5) The Council on Postsecondary Education shall review each proposal submitted in accordance with
subsection (4)(a) of this section and shall determine if the proposal should be included in the biennial
budget request pursuant to KRS 164.7915.
(6) If the new accredited program will not require dedicated general fund appropriations for capital or
operating expenses beyond the system's regular appropriations, the KCTCS may proceed with the new
program in accordance with KRS 164.020(15).
Section 7. KRS 164.591 is amended to read as follows:
(1) If the president of the KCTCS determines that there is a necessity to create or expand any college or campus
requiring an appropriation by the General Assembly due to a new accredited program or workforce
initiative program proposed in accordance with subsection (4)(a) of Section 6 of this Act, the president
shall:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

10 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(a) Include a plan for review and approval by the KCTCS board of regents for inclusion in the biennial
budget request pursuant to KRS 164.7915; and
(b) The president shall not be authorized to move forward to create or expand any college or campus
under this subsection unless the General Assembly appropriates funds and the council approves the
proposal in accordance with subsection (5) of Section 6 of this Act.
(2) No later than thirty (30) days after approval of the proposed plan by the council, the KCTCS shall submit
the proposed plan in its entirety and a report on the proposed plan to the Legislative Research Commission
for referral to the Interim Joint Committees on Education and Appropriations and Revenue or, when the
General Assembly is in session, to the Senate Standing Committees on Education and Appropriations and
Revenue and the House Standing Committees on Postsecondary Education and Appropriations and
Revenue, which includes the following as it relates to the proposed plan:
(a) An accounting of all necessary expenditures by fund source;
(b) A detailed accounting of all administrative expenses;
(c) A detailed accounting of all expenses not otherwise classified;
(d) Identification of any reduction in expenditures;
(e) An explanation of any new expenses or cost savings expected to be realized based on the plan; and
(f) An explanation of how the plan aligns with the operational plan of the KCTCS and the strategic plan
of the council.
(3) The KCTCS shall submit documentation of capital and operating expenses associated with and specific to
the plan with the next biennial budget request.
(4) Final approval of the proposed plan shall require the president of the KCTCS to obtain approval by the
General Assembly by means of an act or joint resolution explicitly identifying and authorizing
implementation of the plan.
(5) By October 1, 2026, and annually thereafter, the KCTCS shall submit a report to the Legislative Research
Commission for referral to the Interim Joint Committees on Education and Appropriations and Revenue
providing the location, size of property, square footage of buildings, whether owned, leased, or rented, and
the use of each property or building utilized by each college within the system, including all main campuses
and satellite facilities, buildings, and properties as of January 1 of the year of submission[A community
college or extension of a community college shall be maintained in each of the following locations: Ashland,
Carrollton, Cumberland, Elizabethtown, Glasgow, Henderson, Hopkinsville, Fayette County, Madisonville,
Owensboro, Paducah, Prestonsburg, Somerset, Blackey-Hazard, Jefferson County and Mason County. The
headquarters of the administration of the Kentucky Community and Technical College System shall be
maintained in Woodford County. Western Kentucky University may continue to operate a community college
in Bowling Green. Additional extension centers may be established by the board of regents for the Kentucky
Community and Technical College System with approval of the Council on Postsecondary Education. New
community colleges shall require approval of the General Assembly].
Section 8. KRS 164.600 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section and Sections 1 and 7 of this Act, unless the context requires otherwise:
(a) "Campus" means a location of a college of the system that is not located contiguous to the main
college location["Chief executive officer" means a president or the head administrator of a college
within the Kentucky Community and Technical College System];
(b) "Chancellor" means the chief officer of a college or colleges within the system;
(c) "College" means a community college, a technical college, or a community and technical college within
the system;
(d)[(c)] "KCTCS president" means the president[chief executive officer] of the system;
(e)[(d)] "Relative" means father, mother, brother, brother-in-law, sister, sister-in-law, husband, wife,
son, daughter, aunt, uncle, first cousin, son-in-law, and daughter-in-law; and
(f)[(e)] "System" or "KCTCS" means the Kentucky Community and Technical College System.

CHAPTER 164 11
(2) There shall be a chancellor named for each[board of directors for each community college or community and
technical] college under the Kentucky Community and Technical College system.[, except as provided in KRS
165.160. The board of regents may designate that a local board of directors serve more than one college. Each
board of directors shall]
(3) Each chancellor shall be responsible for creating an annual budget request for his or her college and
submitting it to the KCTCS president for consideration in the creation of the systemwide budget request to
be submitted to the General Assembly.
(4) Each chancellor shall create and implement an operations plan for his or her college that is developed in
coordination with local employers, civic leaders, campus constituents, and other postsecondary institutions
in the region and consistent with the strategic agenda of the Council on Postsecondary Education. The
KCTCS president shall review and approve each operations plan prior to implementation by the chancellor
of each college[:
(a) Recommend one (1) candidate for college chief executive officer from three (3) candidates provided by
the president. The president shall have the authority to make the final appointment and shall not be
bound by the recommendation from the board of directors;
(b) Evaluate the college chief executive officer and advise the president of his or her performance. The
president has final authority for the appointment and termination of the college chief executive officer;
(c) Approve budget requests for recommendation to the Kentucky Community and Technical College
System;
(d) Adopt and amend an annual operating budget and submit it to the board of regents for approval as to the
compliance with its guidelines;
(e) Approve a strategic plan that is developed in coordination with local employers, civic leaders, campus
constituents, and other postsecondary institutions in the region and that is consistent with the strategic
agenda of the General Assembly].
(5)[(3)] Each chancellor[The chief executive officer of each college] shall implement his or her college's[have
full authority and discretion regarding the use and management of the] budget within the system budget as
approved by the KCTCS board of regents[ for the Kentucky Community and Technical College System] under
KRS 164.350.
(6) Each chancellor shall be responsible for the day-to-day operations of his or her college[
(4) Each board of directors shall consist of ten (10) members, seven (7) of whom shall be appointed by the
Governor from nominees of the respective college nominating commission established under KRS 164.602 for
a term set by law pursuant to Section 23 of the Constitution of Kentucky. The other three (3) board members
shall be one (1) member of the teaching faculty, one (1) member of the staff, and one (1) member of the
student body. An appointed member's term shall be six (6) years.
(5) The faculty member shall be on the teaching or research faculty of the college. The faculty member shall be
elected by secret ballot of all full-time faculty members of the college. Faculty members shall serve for terms
of three (3) years and until their successors are elected and qualified. Faculty members shall be eligible for
reelection, but they shall be ineligible to continue to serve as members of the boards if they cease to be
members of the teaching staff of the college. Elections to fill vacancies shall be for the unexpired term in the
same manner as provided for original election.
(6) The staff member shall be a classified or midmanagement employee who does not hold faculty rank and who
does not hold an upper administrative position. The staff member shall be elected by secret ballot of all full-
time staff members of the college. Staff members shall serve for terms of three (3) years and until their
successors are elected and qualified. Staff members shall be eligible for reelection, but shall be ineligible to
continue to serve as members of the boards if they cease to be members of the staff of the college. An election
to fill a vacancy for an unexpired term shall be held in the same manner as an election to an original full term.
(7) The student member shall be elected by secret ballot from the student body of the college to serve a term of
one (1) year. The student member shall be a full-time student who maintains permanent residency in the
Commonwealth of Kentucky.
(8) If a board of directors is designated by the board of regents to serve more than one college as permitted under
subsection (2) of this section, the board of regents shall define procedures for the selection of the faculty, staff,
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

12 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
and student representatives to the board of directors to ensure that there is opportunity for all colleges to be
represented.
(9) The members of the board of directors shall receive no compensation for their services but shall be paid for
their actual and necessary expenses.
(10) No citizen member of the board of directors shall have a conflict of interest in accordance with KRS 45A.340
or be a relative of any employee of the college under its jurisdiction. A person who is a member of the board
on July 15, 1998, who is a relative of an employee of the college may finish out the appointed term of office
but the member may not be reappointed].
Section 9. KRS 164.011 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created and established a Council on Postsecondary Education in Kentucky as an agency,
instrumentality, and political subdivision of the Commonwealth and a public body corporate and politic having
all powers, duties, and responsibilities as are provided to it by law, appointed for a term set by law pursuant to
Section 93[23] of the Constitution of Kentucky. The council shall be composed of the commissioner of
education, a faculty member, a student member, and thirteen (13) citizen members appointed by the Governor.
The citizen members shall be confirmed by the Senate under KRS 11.160, and the commissioner of education
shall serve as a nonvoting ex officio member. Citizen council members shall be selected from a list of
nominees provided to the Governor under the nominating process set forth in KRS 164.005. If the General
Assembly is not in session at the time of the appointment, persons appointed shall serve prior to confirmation,
but the Governor shall seek the consent of the Senate at the next regular session or at an intervening
extraordinary session if the matter is included in the call of the General Assembly.
(2) [By no later than thirty (30) days after May 30, 1997, ]The Governor's Postsecondary Education Nominating
Committee shall submit nominations to the Governor as set forth in KRS 164.005. On making appointments to
the council, the Governor shall ensure broad geographical and political representation and[; ensure equal
representation of the two (2) sexes, inasmuch as possible;] ensure no less than proportional representation of
the two (2) leading political parties of the Commonwealth based on the state's voter registration and the
political affiliation of each appointee as of December 31 of the year preceding the date of his or her
appointment[; and ensure that appointments reflect the minority racial composition of the Commonwealth
based on the total minority racial population using the most recent census or estimate data from the United
States Census Bureau. If the determination of proportional minority representation does not result in a whole
number of minority members, it shall be rounded up to the next whole number]. A particular political
affiliation shall not be a prerequisite to appointment to the council generally; however, if any person is
appointed to the council that does not represent either of the two (2) leading political parties of the
Commonwealth, the proportional representation by political affiliation requirement shall be determined and
satisfied based on the total number of members on the council less any members not affiliated with either of
the two (2) leading political parties.[ In filling vacancies to the council, the Governor shall act so as to provide,
inasmuch as possible, equal representation of the two (2) sexes by appointing a member of the sex that is the
lesser represented at the time of the appointment. If the remaining membership already has an equal number of
males and females, the Governor may appoint a member of either sex.] No more than two (2) members of the
council shall hold an undergraduate degree from any one (1) Kentucky university, and no more than three (3)
voting members of the council shall reside in any one (1) judicial district of the Kentucky Supreme Court as of
the date of the appointment. However, change in residency after the date of appointment shall not affect the
ability to serve.
(3) One (1) member shall be a full-time faculty member employed at a state institution of postsecondary
education. The faculty member shall be appointed to a four (4) year term by the Governor from a list of three
(3) nominees selected and submitted by majority vote of the ten (10) faculty members who serve as faculty
representatives of the boards of trustees and boards of regents of the nine (9) postsecondary education
institutions.
(4) One (1) member shall be enrolled as a full-time student at a state institution of postsecondary education and
shall be selected annually in the following manner: not later than June 1 of each year, the eight (8) student
body presidents of the four (4) year state public institutions of higher education, the [two (2) ]student body
member of[members to] the Kentucky Community and Technical College System board of regents, and one
(1) student body president representing the members of the Association of Independent Kentucky Colleges and
Universities shall elect by majority vote three (3) nominees to submit to the Governor. From this list of
nominees, the Governor shall appoint a student member.

CHAPTER 164 13
(5) In filling any vacancies, the Governor shall ensure the continuing representation upon the council of the broad
constituencies as set forth in subsection (2) of this section. Vacancies on the council shall be filled for the
unexpired term in accordance with the procedures established for the original appointments.
(6) Each newly appointed citizen member shall serve a term of four (4)[ six (6)] years unless removed by the
Governor for cause[, except the initial appointments shall be as follows:
(a) Two (2) appointments shall expire December 31, 1997;
(b) Three (3) appointments shall expire December 31, 1998;
(c) Two (2) appointments shall expire December 31, 1999;
(d) Two (2) appointments shall expire December 31, 2000;
(e) Two (2) appointments shall expire December 31, 2001; and
(f) Two (2) appointments shall expire December 31, 2002].
(7) Any person, other than the chief state school officer, holding either an elective or appointive state office or
who is a member of the governing board of any state university in Kentucky, shall be ineligible for
membership or appointment on the council during his term.
(8) The members of the council shall elect the chair and the vice chair of the council from among the council's
membership, and the chair and vice chair shall serve at the pleasure of the council. The vice chair shall serve
as chair in the absence of the chair.
(9) The council shall meet at least quarterly and at other times upon the call of the chair or a majority of the
council.
(10) A quorum shall be a majority of the appointive membership of the council.
(11) A quorum shall be required to organize and conduct the business of the council, except that an affirmative vote
of eight (8) or more appointive members of the entire council shall be required to dismiss from employment
the president of the council, and to adopt or amend the state strategic postsecondary education agenda.
(12) New appointees to the council shall not serve more than two (2) consecutive terms.
(13) New appointees to the council shall complete an orientation and education program set forth in KRS
164.020(24) to be eligible for appointment to a second term.
Section 10. KRS 164.0211 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The student body president of each four (4) year public university, the student member of[two (2) student
regents to be designated by] the board of regents of the Kentucky Community and Technical College System,
and one (1) student body president representing the members of the Association of Independent Kentucky
Colleges and Universities shall serve on an advisory board to be known as the Board of Student Body
Presidents. The student body president representing the independent colleges and universities shall be selected
under a process established by the Association of Independent Kentucky Colleges and Universities.
(2) The Board of Student Body Presidents shall advise the legislative and executive branches regarding
postsecondary education issues and concerns of students.
(3) At least once each year, the Board of Student Body Presidents shall meet with the Council on Postsecondary
Education and the Advisory Conference of Presidents.
(4) The Board of Student Body Presidents shall submit the names of three (3) nominees to the Governor for
consideration in the appointment of a student member to the Council on Postsecondary Education pursuant to
KRS 164.011.
Section 11. KRS 164.001 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) "Administrator" means the chief executive officer of the institution;
(2) "Adult basic education" means instruction in mathematics, science, social studies, reading, language arts, and
related areas to enable individuals to better function in society;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

14 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(3) "Benchmarks" means objective measures developed where applicable or practical by the Council on
Postsecondary Education to judge the performance of the postsecondary education system and progress toward
the goals as stated in KRS 164.003(2);
(4) "Board" or "governing board" means the board of trustees for the University of Kentucky or the University of
Louisville, the board of regents for a comprehensive university, or the board of regents for the Kentucky
Community and Technical College System;
(5) "Board of regents" means the governing board of each comprehensive university and the Kentucky
Community and Technical College System;
(6) "Committee" means the Strategic Committee on Postsecondary Education created in KRS 164.004;
(7) "Comprehensive university" means the following public institutions: Eastern Kentucky University, Kentucky
State University, Morehead State University, Murray State University, Northern Kentucky University, and
Western Kentucky University;
(8) "Council" means the Council on Postsecondary Education created in KRS 164.011;
(9) "Customized training" means training in specific academic areas, work processes, or technical skills that are
designed to serve a specific industry or industries to upgrade worker skills;
(10) "Goals" means the six (6) goals specified in KRS 164.003(2);
(11) "Independent institution" means a nonpublic postsecondary education institution in Kentucky whose
instruction is not solely sectarian in nature, is accredited by a regional accrediting association recognized by
the United States Department of Education, and is licensed by the Council on Postsecondary Education;
(12) "Institution" means a university, college, community college, health technology center, vocational-technical
school, technical institute, technical college, technology center, or the Kentucky Community and Technical
College System;
(13) "Kentucky Community and Technical College System" or "KCTCS" means the system composed of public
community and technical colleges, including those postsecondary institutions operated by the former Cabinet
for Workforce Development and those community colleges in the University of Kentucky Community College
System on May 30, 1997.
The system also includes institutions created by the board of regents for the Kentucky Community and
Technical College System and approved by the General Assembly;
(14) "Literacy" means an individual's ability to read, write, and speak in English and compute and solve problems
at levels of proficiency necessary to function on the job and in society to achieve one's goals and develop one's
knowledge and potential;
(15) "Lower division academic course" means any academic course offered for college or university credit that is
designated as a freshman or sophomore level academic course;
(16) "Nonteaching personnel" means any employee who is a full-time staff member, excluding a president,
chancellor, vice president, academic dean, academic department chair, or administrator;
(17) "Postsecondary education system" means the following public institutions: University of Kentucky, University
of Louisville, Eastern Kentucky University, Kentucky State University, Morehead State University, Murray
State University, Northern Kentucky University, Western Kentucky University, and the Kentucky Community
and Technical College System;
(18) "P-16 council" or "council of partners" means a local or state council that is composed of educators from
public and private preschools, elementary, secondary, and postsecondary education institutions, local board of
education members, and may include community and business representatives that have voluntarily organized
themselves for the purpose of improving the alignment and quality of the education continuum from preschool
through postsecondary education as well as student achievement at all levels;
(19) "Public" means operated with state support;
(20) "Relative" means a person's father, mother, brother, sister, husband, wife, son, daughter, aunt, uncle, son-in-
law, or daughter-in-law;

CHAPTER 164 15
(21) "Remedial education" means any program, course, or activity that is designed specifically for students who
have basic deficiencies in reading, written or oral communication, mathematics, study skills, or other skills
necessary to do beginning postsecondary work as defined by the institution;
(22) "Standardized degree program" means a program, approved by the Council on Postsecondary Education, that
consists of specific competencies, curriculum, and performance requirements regardless of the providing
institution;
(23) "Strategic agenda" means the state strategic postsecondary education agenda described in KRS 164.0203;
(24) "Technical institution" means an educational institution that offers certificates, diplomas, or technical degrees
in technical or occupational-related programs, including a facility called a vocational-technical school,
technical institute, health technology center, technology center, technical college, or similar designation; and
(25) "Learning outcomes" means the knowledge, skills, and abilities that students have attained as a result of their
involvement in a particular set of educational experiences.
Section 12. KRS 164.7011 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 164.7011 to 164.7021:
(1) "Advisory committee" means the Kentucky Aerospace, Aviation, and Defense Investment Fund Advisory
Committee established in KRS 164.7013;
(2) "Aviation" means the operation, maintenance, or manufacturing of aircraft or other aerospace equipment,
aerospace initiatives and efforts, and defense-related products related to aerospace and aviation;
(3) "Aviation industry partner" means a grantor to the fund that the council determines customarily employs
individuals with an eligible aviation or aerospace credential in a relevant aviation role in the usual course of
the grantor's business;
(4) "Aviation program":
(a) Means an education or training program located in Kentucky that issues eligible aviation or aerospace
credentials or is a specific requirement to earning an eligible aviation or aerospace credential, including
but not limited to a public high school vocational program; and
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, does not include a flight training program unless that
program is a certified pilot school regulated by the Federal Aviation Administration in accordance with
14 C.F.R. pt. 141, a certified public postsecondary pilot school regulated by the Federal Aviation
Administration in accordance with 14 C.F.R. pt. 61, or is a public high school vocational program;
(5) "Council" means the Council on Postsecondary Education;
(6) "Dedicated moneys" means a gift, grant, or donation to the fund that is subject to restrictions imposed by a
private grantor under KRS 164.7015;
(7) "Eligible aviation credential" means:
(a) Any license or certification issued by the Federal Aviation Administration;
(b) A Bachelor of Science in aviation issued by a postsecondary education institution overseen or licensed
by the council and located in Kentucky;
(c) Any engineering degree issued by a postsecondary education institution overseen or licensed by the
council and located in Kentucky; or
(d) A career and technical education license or certification determined by the council, in collaboration
with the advisory committee, to be in high demand and relevant to the aerospace industry;
(8) "Fund" means the Kentucky aerospace, aviation, and defense investment fund established in KRS 164.7013;
(9) "Grantor" means an individual or an entity that gifts, grants, or donates moneys to the fund;
(10) "Immediate family" means an individual's parents, siblings, spouse, and children;
(11) "Kentucky resident" means a Kentucky resident as defined by the council pursuant to KRS 164.020(8); and
(12) "Public aviation program" is an aviation program that is a public high school vocational program or institution
that is a member of Kentucky's public postsecondary education system.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

16 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
Section 13. The following KRS sections are repealed:
164.586 Personnel dispute resolution system.
164.587 Medical and accident insurance program for students.
164.594 Service area of Prestonsburg Community College to include Pike County.
164.602 Nominating commission for appointments to board of directors.
164.5833 Transferability of course work accepted prior to establishment of system.
Section 14. (1) Notwithstanding subsection (2)(c) of Section 1 of this Act, initial appointments to the
board of regents of the Kentucky Community and Technical College System under subsection (2)(b)1.a.i. to vi. of
Section 1 of this Act shall be as follows:
(a) One member shall serve a one-year term;
(b) One member shall serve a two-year term;
(c) Two members shall serve a three-year term; and
(d) Two members shall serve a four-year term.
(2) Upon the expiration of the initial appointments under subsection (1) of this section, members shall be
appointed under subsection (2)(b)1.a.i. to vi. of Section 1 of this Act to four-year terms in accordance with subsection
(2)(c) of Section 1 of this Act.
(3) The eight members appointed to the board of regents of the Kentucky Community and Technical
College System by the Governor under KRS 164.321 before the effective date of this Act shall continue to serve on
the board until the expiration of their terms, at which time their successors shall be appointed in accordance with
Section 1 of this Act.
Veto Overridden April 14, 2026.